Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 13.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-4836
Delivery of document of gift not
required; right to examine.

(a) A document of gift need not be delivered during the
donor's lifetime to be effective.

(b)
Upon or after an individual's death, a person in possession of a document
of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift with respect to the individual
shall allow examination and copying of the document of gift or refusal by
a person authorized to make or object to the making of an anatomical gift
with respect to the individual or by a person to which the gift could pass
under section 71-4834.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 13.